Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1333DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1333DP (1) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 11.6, subsection 11, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. The auditor of state shall adopt rules in accordance with
chapter 17A to establish and collect a periodic examination fee
from cities that are not required to have an audit or required
fiscal year examination conducted pursuant to subsection 1
during a fiscal year. Such fees are due on March 31 each year.
The auditor of state shall base the periodic examination fees
the auditor of state establishes shall be on a sliding scale,
based on the city’s budgeted gross expenditures, to produce
total revenue of not more than three six hundred seventy-five
thousand dollars for each fiscal year. However, cities that
pay a filing fee for an audit or examination pursuant to
subsection 10 during the fiscal year are not required to pay
the periodic examination fee. The funds collected shall be
maintained in a segregated account for use by the office of the
auditor of state in performing periodic examinations conducted
pursuant to subsection 1. However, if the fees collected in
one fiscal year exceed three six hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars, the auditor of state shall apply the excess funds
to provide training to city officials on municipal financial
management or shall contract with a qualified organization
to provide such training. Notwithstanding section 8.33, any
fees collected by the auditor of state for these purposes that
remain unexpended at the end of the fiscal year shall not
revert to the general fund of the state or any other fund but
shall remain available for use for the following fiscal year
for the purposes authorized in this subsection.
Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to fees collected
in fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.